Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.5365 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and unless required under federal
law, the Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with
which[whom] the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services are hereby
prohibited from expending any Medicaid funds on any of the following:
(1) Cross-sex hormones when prescribed or administered primarily or solely for the
treatment of gender dysphoria; and
(2) Gender reassignment surgery to alter or remove physical or anatomical
characteristics or features that are typical for and characteristic of a person's
biological sex.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/27/2026 8:54 AM Jacketed